Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,126
Report; confidential; immunity; use of documents.

(1) A report made to the department under section 38-1,124 or 38-1,125 shall be confidential. The identity of any person making such report or providing information leading to the making of such report shall be confidential.

(2) Any person making such a report to the department, except a person who is self-reporting, shall be completely immune from criminal or civil liability of any nature, whether direct or derivative, for filing a report or for disclosure of documents, records, or other information to the department under section 38-1,124 or 38-1,125.

(3) Persons who are members of committees established under the Health Care Quality Improvement Act, the Patient Safety Improvement Act, or section 25-12,123 or witnesses before such committees shall not be required to report under section 38-1,124 or 38-1,125. Any person who is a witness before such a committee shall not be excused from reporting matters of first-hand knowledge that would otherwise be reportable under section 38-1,124 or 38-1,125 only because he or she attended or testified before such committee.

(4) Documents from original sources shall not be construed as immune from discovery or use in actions under section 38-1,125.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 126;

Laws 2011, LB431, § 12;

Laws 2016, LB750, § 6.

Health Care Quality Improvement Act, see section 71-7904.

Patient Safety Improvement Act, see section 71-8701.